Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
FORMATION

7-80-201. Limited liability company name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 417, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 63, § 1, effective March 22; (4)(a) and (4)(c) amended, p. 859, § 20, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(4)(d) added, p. 88, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4)(a) amended, p. 760, § 24, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-80-202. Reservation of name - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 418, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2003:

(3) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-80-203. Formation.

One or more persons may form a limited liability company by delivering articles of organization to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. Any such person who is an individual shall be of the age of eighteen years or older. Such person or persons need not be members of the limited liability company after formation has occurred.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 418, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(2) repealed, p. 712, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1503, § 13, effective June 3.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1833, § 71, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1697, § 69, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2265, § 178, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1459, § 181, effective July 1.

7-80-204. Articles of organization.

The articles of organization shall state:

The domestic entity name of the limited liability company, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 712, § 7, effective July 1, 1994.)

The principal office address of the limited liability company's initial principal office;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the limited liability company's initial registered agent;

The true name and mailing address of each person forming the limited liability company pursuant to section

7-80-203

;

That management of the limited liability company is vested in one or more managers or is vested in the members, whichever be the case;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2265, § 179, effective July 1, 2004.)

That there is at least one member of the limited liability company; and

Any other matters relating to the limited liability company or the articles of organization the persons forming the limited liability company determine to include therein.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2265, § 179, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 418, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1)(b), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(f) added, p. 712, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1503, § 14, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2265, § 179, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b.5) and (1)(d) amended and (1)(g) and (1)(h) added, p. 1460, § 182, effective July 1.

7-80-205. Filing of articles of organization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 419, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2003:

(3) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-80-206. Appeal from secretary of state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 419, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-80-207. Effect of filing of articles of organization.

A limited liability company is formed when its articles of organization become effective.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 419, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 959, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1833, § 72, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 1697, § 70, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section R&RE, p. 2266, § 180, effective July 1, 2004.

7-80-208. Notice of existence of limited liability company.

The fact that the articles of organization are on file in the records of the secretary of state is notice that the limited liability company is a limited liability company and is notice of all other facts stated therein that are required to be stated in the articles of organization by section 7-80-204.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 420, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1503, § 15, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2266, § 181, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1460, § 183, effective July 1.

7-80-209. Amendment of articles of organization.

The articles of organization may be amended at any time for any purpose and shall be amended when:

There is a change in the domestic entity name of the limited liability company;

There is a false or erroneous statement in the articles of organization.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 713, § 8, effective July 1, 1994.)

(1.5) An amendment to the articles of organization is invalid unless approved by all of the members or in such other manner as may be provided in the operating agreement.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2266, § 182, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1833, § 73, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1697, § 71, effective October 1, 2002.)

A limited liability company amends its articles of organization by delivering articles of amendment to its articles of organization to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, stating:

The domestic entity name of the limited liability company; and

The amendment to the articles of organization.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 420, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended and (1.5) added, p. 713, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) to (4) amended, p. 1833, § 73, effective July 1; (2) to (4) amended, p. 1697, § 71, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (2) amended, p. 2266, § 182, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1.5) amended, p. 938, § 5, effective July 1; (5) added, p. 1460, § 184, effective July 1.